Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB76.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 511. Cultivating cannabis for personal use.A patient who is 21 years of age or older and has been a resident of this Commonwealth for a period of at least 30 days may cultivate cannabis for personal use subject to the following:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (1) A patient may cultivate up to six cannabis plants, which may be more than five inches tall, and in a vegetative or fruiting or flowering phase.(2) Cannabis cultivation must take place in an enclosed and locked space.(3) A patient may purchase cannabis seeds from a dispensary for the purpose of home cultivation. Seeds may not be given or sold to any other person.(4) Cannabis plants may not be stored or placed in a location where the plants are subject to ordinary public view. A patient who cultivates cannabis under this section shall take reasonable precautions to ensure that the plants are secure from unauthorized access, including unauthorized access by an individual under 21 years of age.(5) Cannabis cultivation may occur only on residential property lawfully in the patient's possession or with the consent of the person in lawful possession of the property. An owner or lessor of residential property may prohibit the cultivation of cannabis by a lessee.(6) Cannabis plants may only be tended to by:(i) A patient who resides at the residence, or their authorized agent attending to the residence for brief periods, including when the patient is temporarily away from the residence.(ii) The caregiver of a patient who is physically unable to tend to the plants.(7) A patient who cultivates more than the allowable number of cannabis plants, or who sells or gives away cannabis plants, cannabis or cannabis-infused products produced under this section, shall be liable for penalties as 20250SB0076PN0032 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided by law in addition to loss of home cultivation privileges under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0076PN0032 - 3 - 123